Utah statutes.
64-13-16.   Inmate employment.
(1) The department may employ inmates, unless incapable of employment because
of sickness or other infirmity or for security reasons, to the degree that
funding and available resources allow.  An offender may not be employed on
work which benefits any employee or officer of the department.
(2)  An offender employed under this section is not considered an employee,
worker, workman, or operative for purposes of Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers'
Compensation Act, except as required by federal statute or regulation.
